Texas, session 892, HB272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 140, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 140.015 to read as follows: Sec. 140.015.  DISASTER RESPONSE ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM. (a) In this section: (1)  "Disaster" has the meaning assigned by Section 418.004, Government Code. (2)  "Grant" means a grant authorized to be awarded by the comptroller under the disaster response assistance grant program established by this section. (b)  The comptroller shall establish and administer the disaster response assistance grant program to reimburse municipalities and counties for costs associated with the operation of a helicopter owned by the municipality or county in response to a multi-county disaster. (c)  The comptroller shall establish the eligibility requirements for a grant awarded under this section. The requirements must prohibit a municipality or county from recovering an expense for which the municipality or county otherwise has received or will receive funds from the federal government or the state. (d)  A municipality or county may not receive more than $750,000 in a calendar year in grants under this section. (e)  The comptroller shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section, including rules that establish: (1)  a standardized application process, including the form to be used to apply for a grant and the manner of submitting the form; (2)  deadlines for: (A)  applying for the grant; (B)  disbursement of grant money; and (C)  spending grant money; and (3)  procedures for: (A)  monitoring the disbursement of grant money to ensure compliance with this section; and (B)  the return of grant money that was not used by a municipality or county for a purpose authorized by this section. SECTION 2.  Not later than May 1, 2026, the comptroller of public accounts shall establish and administer the disaster response assistance grant program and adopt the rules necessary to implement the program as required by Section 140.015, Local Government Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.